Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-601
Political subdivision; offices to be filled; filing deadlines; notices required.

(1) Each political subdivision shall notify the election commissioner or county clerk of the offices to be filled no later than:

(a) January 5 of any election year as provided in subsection (2) of section 32-404; or

(b) June 15 of any election year as provided in subsection (3) of section 32-404.

(2) The election commissioner or county clerk shall give notice of the offices to be filled by election and the filing deadlines for such offices by publication in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county once at least fifteen days prior to such deadlines.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 169;

Laws 2017, LB451, § 9.